Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,124
Statement, defined.

As used in sections 25-12,124 to 25-12,126, unless the context otherwise requires, statement shall mean a recorded or written account of the facts out of which an injury arose given by the injured person to a person having an adverse interest. Statement shall not include (1) insurance claims forms, (2) medical authorizations, or (3) personal injury or accident report forms which are completed when an adverse person is not present.

Laws 1988, LB 191, § 1.